Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LAWNS TO LEGUMES; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for the lawns to legumes program under Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.104. new text end